District of Columbia statutes.
48-703

License requirements.

(a)

To obtain a license to manufacture, distribute, or wholesale any drug, any person who has a principal place of business in the District shall submit a completed application form with the required application fee to the Mayor and comply with the requirements of this chapter and the rules issued pursuant to this chapter.

(b)

If a person manufactures, distributes, or wholesales any drug at more than one place of business in the District, the person shall apply for a separate license for each place of business.

(c)

If a licensee manufactures, distributes, or wholesales a drug not listed on the application, the licensee shall notify the Mayor prior to the commencement of the activity.

(d)

If a licensee ceases to manufacture, distribute, or wholesale any drug listed in the application, the licensee shall notify the Mayor of the change no later than 7 days after ceasing the activity.

(e)

Each licensee shall maintain records as required by the Mayor, including but not limited to the quantities of each drug manufactured, distributed, or wholesaled daily and the name, address, purchaser, place of delivery, and quantity of any drug sold, transferred, or distributed by a licensee.

(f)

Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as a Public Health: Pharmacy and Pharmaceuticals endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of Title 47.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 4, 37 DCR 2631
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(ff), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(ii), 50 DCR 6913

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-1003.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (f), substituted “Public Health: Pharmacy and Pharmaceuticals endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class A Public Health: Pharmacy and Pharmaceuticals endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(ii) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).